Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-509
Matching funds authorized.

The Nebraska State Historical Society may use General Fund appropriations to match other funds, grants, or money received to carry out the Nebraska Archaeological Resources Preservation Act.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 9.